src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-A-I-itapoo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - itapoo - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, go AEW NA2
     Fut+itapoo+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitáakitapoo
     Fut+itapoo+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitáakitapoohpinnaan, nitáakitapoohpinnaana]
     Fut+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kitáakitapóóhpa
     Fut+PV/it+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakitsitapoowa
     Fut+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakitapoowa
     Fut+itapoo+VAI+Ind+21Pl: áakitapaoo'pa
     Dur+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kitáítapoohpa
     itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: itapóówa
     itapoo+VAI+Ind+21Pl: itapáóo'pa
     Past+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iitapóówa
     Dur+PN/sstsim+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áísstsimitapóowa
     Fut+PN/otoom+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakotóómitapoowa
     Neg+PV/káák+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: máátsikakitapoowa
     Fut+PN/otam+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakotámitapoowa
     PV/aahksikkam+PV/á'p+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: ááhksíkkama'pitapoowa
     PV/áák+PV/oht+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitáákohtsitapoo
     PV/áák+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitáákitapoo
     Fut+PV/ikipp+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áaksikíppitapoowa
     itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kitsítapoohpa
     PV/áák+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kitáákitapoohpa
     PV/stam+itapoo+VAI+Imp+2Sg: stámitapoot
     PV/mátt+PV/it+itapoo+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nimáttsitsitapoohpinnaana
     Neg+PV/anow+Dur+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: máátánowaitapoohpa
     PV/itam+/it+Dur+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: itámitaitapoowa
     Dur+PV/issk+PV/ahsa+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áísskahsaitapoowa
